North Dakota, session 69, HB1294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 39-06.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. For a moving violation as defined in section 39-06.1-09, a fee of twenty dollars, except for:
a. A violation of section 39-10-26, 39-10-26.2, 39-10-41, or 39-10-42, a fee of fifty dollars.
b. A violation of section 39-10-05 involving failure to yield to a pedestrian or subsection 1 of
section 39-10-28, a fee of fifty dollars.
c. A violation of section 39-21-41.2, a fee of twenty-five dollars.
d. A violation of subsection 1 of section 39-12-02, section 39-08-23, or section 39-08-25, a
fee of one hundred dollars.
e. A violation of subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 39-12-04, a fee of one hundred
dollars.
f. A violation of subsection 6 of section 39-04-37, a fee of one hundred dollars.
g. A violation of subsection 2 of section 39-10-21.1, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars.
h. A violation of section 39-10-59, a fee of five hundred dollars.
i. A violation of section 39-09-01, a fee of thirty dollars.
j. A violation of section 39-09-01.1, a fee of thirty dollars.
k. A violation of section 39-10-46 or 39-10-46.1, a fee of one hundredtwo hundred fifty
dollars.
l. A violation of subsection 1 of section 39-08-20, one hundred fifty dollars for a first
violation and three hundred dollars for a second or subsequent violation in three years.
m. A violation of section 39-10-24 or 39-10-44, a fee of forty dollars.
n. A violation of section 39-10-50.1, a fee of fifty dollars.
o. A violation of section 39-19-03, a fee of fifty dollars.

H. B. NO. 1294 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1294.
House Vote: Yeas 80 Nays 9 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State